Utah statutes.
58-61-305.   Qualifications for admission to examination.
All applicants for admission to any examination qualifying an individual for
licensure under this chapter shall:
(1)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(2)  pay the fee established for the examination; and
(3)  certify under penalty of perjury as evidenced by notarized signature on
the application for admission to the examination that the applicant:
(a)  has completed the education requirement under this chapter and been
awarded the earned degree required for licensure; and
(b)  has successfully completed the supervised training required under this
chapter for licensure.
